North Dakota, session 69, SB2210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - WATER MANAGEMENT BASED ON
WATERSHED BOUNDARIES. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall study the
feasibility and desirability of assigning management authority for the waters of the state to the area
located in the naturally occurring watershed, rather than assigning management authority based on
political subdivision boundaries. The study must review the approaches used for managing water in
surrounding states; the powers, duties, and organizational structure of watershed boards; dispute
resolution procedures afforded to individuals residing within the boundaries of a watershed district; the
mechanism to initiate, implement, and improve works projects within a watershed district; and the role
of the department of water resources in mapping and establishing watershed boundaries. The
legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any legislation
required to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.

S. B. NO. 2210 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2210.
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 2 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 85 Nays 3 Absent 6
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State